Utah statutes.
53A-20-109.   Required contract terms.

A contract for the construction of a school building shall contain a clause that addresses the rights of the parties when, after the contract is executed, site conditions are discovered that:

(1)  the contractor did not know existed, and could not have reasonably known existed, at the time that the contract was executed; and

(2)  materially impacts the costs of construction.



Enacted by Chapter 330, 2012 General Session

